Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-325
County sales and use tax; distribution.

The proceeds of the sales and use tax imposed by a county under section 13-319 shall be distributed to the county for deposit in its general fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1177, § 12.